Maine, session 132, LD2076.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2395, as amended by PL 2007, c. 82, §2, is further amended to
read:
§2395. Filing statement Incident report of fire or other occurrence
The municipal fire chief or a designee shall submit to the State Fire Marshal an incident
report for each response made, regardless of whether an actual fire occurred. The Until
January 1, 2026, the report must be submitted in a manner consistent with a national fire
incident reporting system or, as available, a national emergency response information
system. On or after January 1, 2026, the report must be submitted in a manner consistent
with a national emergency response information system or a successor system as
determined by the United States Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency
Management Agency, United States Fire Administration.
Page 1 - 132LR2890(03)

Sec. 2. Rules. The State Fire Marshal within the Department of Public Safety may
adopt rules to collect statewide incident response data and facilitate the transition from a
national fire incident reporting system to a national emergency response information
system, including provisions for electronic submission, technical assistance and system
integration with municipal reporting systems. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are
routine technical rules as described in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. Retroactivity. That section of this Act that amends the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 25, section 2395 applies retroactively to January 1, 2026.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2890(03)